Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Administrative Process for Child Support

405.400.
Short title. [Repealed.]

405.405.
Application of definitions.

The definitions provided in KRS

205.710

shall be applicable to KRS

405.430

to

405.530

, unless the context requires otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 411, § 19, effective July 15, 1988.

405.410.
Purpose. [Repealed.]

405.411.
Newspaper publication of names of persons with child support arrearages or who fail to appear in child support cases.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services’ designee under KRS 205.712(7) for the administration of child support may compile a list of the names of persons under its jurisdiction who have a child support arrearage that equals or exceeds six (6) months without payment, or fail, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with subpoenas or warrants relating to paternity or child support proceedings as provided by 42

U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(16)

. The cabinet may furnish this list to the newspaper of general circulation in that county for publication.

The Department for Income Support, Child Support Enforcement, in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall determine uniform standards for publication. The cabinet is authorized to promulgate the necessary administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

For purposes of this section, “newspaper of general circulation” means a publication bearing a title or name, regularly issued at least as frequently as once a week for a definite price, having a second-class mailing privilege, being not less than four (4) pages, published continuously during the immediately preceding one (1) year period, which is published for the dissemination of news of general interest, and is circulated generally in the political subdivision in which it is published and in which notice is to be given. In any county where a publication fully complying with this definition does not exist, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may publish this list in the publication utilized by the Circuit Court Clerk of the county for publication of other legal notices in the county. A newspaper that is not engaged in the distribution of news of general interest to the public, but that is primarily engaged in the distribution of news of interest to a particular group of citizens, is not a newspaper of general circulation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 630, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 158, § 70, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 112, § 16, effective July 14, 2018.

405.420.
Definitions for KRS 405.400 to 405.530. [Repealed.]

405.430.
Genetic testing to establish paternity — Cabinet may determine child support or child care obligation — Adjustment of child support or child support obligation — Order requiring parent to work or continue educational or training activities — Disclosure of financial records — Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity as basis — Administrative subpoenas to enforce child support obligation — Prohibition — Employment assistance.

When a parent presents himself to the cabinet for the voluntary establishment of paternity and clear evidence of parentage is not present, the cabinet shall pay when administratively ordered the cost of genetic testing to establish paternity, subject to recoupment from the alleged father when paternity is established.

The cabinet shall obtain additional testing in any case if an original test is contested, upon request and advance payment by the contestant.

In a contested paternity case, the child, the mother, and the putative father shall submit to genetic testing upon a request of any of the parties, unless the person or guardian of the person who is requested to submit to genetic testing shows good cause, taking into account the best interests of the child, why the genetic tests cannot be performed. The request shall be supported by a sworn statement of the party, requesting that the test be performed, which shall include the information required by 42

U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(5)

(B)(i) or (ii).

When a parent who fails to support a child is not obligated to provide child support by court order, the cabinet may administratively establish a child support obligation based upon a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity as set forth in KRS Chapter 406, the parent’s minimum monthly child support obligation and proportionate share of child care costs incurred due to employment or job search of either parent, or incurred while receiving elementary or secondary education, or higher education or vocational training which will lead to employment. The monthly child support obligation shall be determined pursuant to the Kentucky child support guidelines set forth in KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

. The actual cost of child care shall be reasonable and shall be allocated between the parents in the same proportion as each parent’s gross income, as determined under the guidelines, bears to the total family gross income.

The cabinet shall recognize a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity as a basis for seeking a support order, irrespective of the alleged father’s willingness to consent to a support order.

When in the best interest of the child, the cabinet may review and adjust a parent’s child support obligation or child care obligation as established by the cabinet, upon a request of the cabinet when an assignment has been made, or upon either parent’s petition if the amount of the child support awarded under the order differs from the amount that would be awarded in accordance with KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

. The cabinet shall notify parents at least once every three (3) years of the right to a review.

In establishing or modifying a parent’s monthly child support obligation, the cabinet may use automated methods to identify orders eligible for review, conduct the review, identify orders eligible for adjustment, and apply the adjustment to eligible orders in accordance with KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

. The cabinet shall utilize information, including financial records, about the parent and child which it has good reason to believe is reliable and may require the parents to provide income verification.

In cases in which past-due support is owed for a child receiving public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act, the cabinet shall issue an administrative order, or seek a judicial order, requiring the obligated parent to participate in work activities, or educational or vocational training activities for at least twenty (20) hours per week, unless the parent is incapacitated as defined by 42

U.S.C. sec. 607

.

The cabinet may disclose financial records only for the purpose of establishing, modifying, or enforcing a child support obligation of an individual. A financial institution shall not be liable to any individual for disclosing any financial record of the individual to the cabinet attempting to establish, modify, or enforce a child support obligation.

The cabinet may issue both intrastate and interstate administrative subpoenas to any individual or entity for financial or other information or documents which are needed to establish, modify, or enforce a child support obligation pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42

U.S.C. secs. 651

et seq. An administrative subpoena lawfully issued in another state to an individual or entity residing in this state shall be honored and enforced in the Circuit Court of the county in which the individual or entity resides.

In any case where a person or entity fails to respond to a subpoena within the specified time frame, the cabinet shall impose a penalty.

No person shall knowingly make, present, or cause to be made or presented to an employee or officer of the cabinet any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement, representation, or entry in any application, report, document, or financial record used in determining child support or child care obligations.

If a person knowingly or by reason of negligence discloses a financial record of an individual, that individual may pursue civil action for damages in a federal District Court or appropriate state court. No liability shall arise with respect to any disclosure which results from a good faith, but erroneous, interpretation. In any civil action brought for reason of negligence of disclosure of financial records, upon finding of liability on the part of the defendant, the defendant shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to:

The sum of the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each act of unauthorized disclosure of financial records; or

The sum of the actual damages sustained by the plaintiff resulting from the unauthorized disclosure; plus

If willful disclosure or disclosure was a result of gross negligence, punitive damages, plus the costs, including attorney fees, of the action.

The cabinet shall issue an administrative order or seek a judicial order requiring a parent with a delinquent child support obligation, as defined by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS

15.055

, to participate in the program described in KRS

205.732

to help low-income, noncustodial parents find and keep employment unless the parent is incapacitated as defined by 42

U.S.C. sec. 607

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 411, § 20, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 418, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 22, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 430, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2022 ch. 122, § 8, effective July 14, 2022.

405.435.
Information from employers and labor organizations upon hiring of Kentucky residents — Use of information by cabinet in matters of paternity and child support — Fine for noncompliance — Hearing.

An employer or labor organization in the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall provide information to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services when that employer or labor organization hires an employee who resides or works in the Commonwealth, or rehires or permits the return to work of an employee who has been laid-off, furloughed, separated, granted a leave without pay, or terminated from employment, unless the reporting could endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission as determined by the secretary of health and family services.

The employer shall provide the information within twenty (20) days of the hiring or return to work of the employee. The information shall include:

The employee’s name, address, and Social Security number;

The employer’s name, address, and, if the employer has been assigned one, federal and state employer identification numbers; and

The date services for remuneration were first performed by the employee.

An employer shall report the required information by submitting a copy of the employee’s W-4 form or, at the option of the employer, an equivalent form provided by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services as prescribed by administrative regulation promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall enter all new hire information into the database of the cabinet within five (5) business days.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A if the Cabinet for Health and Family Services determines exceptions are needed to reduce unnecessary or burdensome reporting or are needed to facilitate cost-effective operation of the cabinet under this section.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall use the information collected pursuant to this section for the location of noncustodial parents, establishment, modification, and enforcement of child support and any other matter related to paternity or child support.

If the employer fails to report as required by this section, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall give the employer written notice of the provisions of this section, including the penalty for failure to report.

If the employer has not filed a report within twenty (20) days from the date that the written notice is sent to him, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall send a second written notice.

If the employer fails to file a W-4 or equivalent form within twenty (20) days from the date that the second written notice is sent, or supplies a false or incomplete report, and the failure is a result of a conspiracy between the employee and the employer to prevent the proper information from being filed within twenty (20) days from the date that the second written notice is sent, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall send the employer by certified mail, return receipt request, notice of an administrative fine. The fine shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per calendar month per person for any violation occurring after the second notice has been given, and continuing until a W-4 or equivalent form is received by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. No fine shall be imposed for any period of less than one (1) full calendar month.

The employer shall have ten (10) days after receipt of the administrative fine notice to request a hearing before the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on whether the administrative fine was properly assessed. If a timely request for a hearing is received, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall schedule and conduct a hearing in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 41, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 55, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 631, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 158, § 71, effective July 12, 2012.

405.440.
Notice of, and hearing on, determination of obligation.

The notice of a minimum monthly support obligation shall be served in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall include at least the following:

The name of the child for whom the support obligation is owed;

The amount of the support debt accrued or accruing;

A statement that the parent’s earnings and property, both real and personal, are subject to judicial and administrative enforcement;

That he may dispute the obligation amount or any other matter contained in the notice by requesting a dispute hearing within twenty (20) days;

That, unless there is good cause as determined by the secretary for his failure to request a hearing, if he does not request a hearing, his agreement will be presumed and the first payment will be due twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice; and

That if he requests a hearing and fails to appear, the hearing officer shall affirm the determination of minimum monthly support obligation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 6, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Graham, Domestic Relations, 73 Ky. L.J. 379 (1984-85).

405.450.
Dispute hearings — Appeal — Payment during pendency of appeal — Contested obligation amount during modification review.

A hearing officer appointed by the secretary shall conduct dispute hearings in the county of the child or parent’s residence or any other location acceptable to the parent, which shall be scheduled within sixty (60) days of the parent’s request for a hearing. The dispute hearing proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The parent’s obligation to pay minimum monthly support shall be stayed until his receipt of the final order.

The parent or the cabinet may file an appeal in the Circuit Court in the county of the parent’s or the child’s residence in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The parent shall, during the pendency of his appeal from the final order, absent a showing of indigency or need exceeding the child’s need, pay the minimum monthly support obligation to the cabinet, which shall, if the parent’s appeal is successful, return his money together with interest at the legal rate for judgments.

If the cabinet elects to conduct the modification review as specified in KRS 405.430(6), either party may contest the adjustment to the obligation amount within thirty (30) days after the date of the notice of the adjustment by requesting a review under subsection (1) of this section and, if appropriate, a request for adjustment of the order as permitted by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 318, § 354, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 24, effective July 15, 1998.

405.460.
Enforcement of support obligation without action of hearing officer — Action to collect debt.

When an arrearage has accrued that is equal to the amount of support payable for one (1) month on court-ordered or administratively-determined child support, which was set prior to July 15, 1988, the cabinet may use judicial or administrative remedies to enforce the support obligation without the necessity of any action by a hearing officer.

In cases where the obligor has not requested a dispute hearing, action to collect the debt may be taken twenty (20) days after the obligor’s receipt of the notice of support obligation or his refusal to accept the notice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 21, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Graham, Domestic Relations, 73 Ky. L.J. 379 (1984-85).

405.463.
Withholding of state lottery winnings of delinquent child support obligors.

The Kentucky Lottery Corporation and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall develop a system to allow the Kentucky Lottery Corporation to receive a list of delinquent child support obligors from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on a monthly basis. The Kentucky Lottery Corporation shall withhold delinquent amounts from prizes of winners that appear on the list. This system shall be timely and shall not create an unavoidable delay in the payment of a lottery prize.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 632, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion for Rule, § 263.24.

405.465.
Income withholding or wage assignments for child support, medical support, maintenance, and medical support insurance orders.

This section shall apply only to those child support, medical support, maintenance, and medical support insurance orders that are established, modified, or enforced by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or those court orders obtained in administering Part D, Title IV of the Federal Social Security Act.

All child support orders and medical support insurance orders being established, modified, or enforced by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or those orders obtained pursuant to the administration of Part D, Title IV of the Federal Social Security Act, shall provide for income withholding which shall begin immediately.

The court shall order either or both parents who are obligated to pay child support, medical support, or maintenance under this section to assign to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that portion of salary or wages of the parent due and to be due in the future as will be sufficient to pay the child support amount ordered by the court.

The order shall be binding upon the employer or any subsequent employer upon the service by certified mail of a copy of the order upon the employer and until further order of the court. The employer may deduct the sum of one dollar ($1) for each payment made pursuant to the order.

The employer shall notify the cabinet when an employee, for whom a wage withholding is in effect, terminates employment and provide the terminated employee’s last known address and the name and address of the terminated employee’s new employer, if known.

An employer with twenty (20) or more employees shall notify in writing the cabinet, or its designee administering the support order, of any lump-sum payment of any kind of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more to be made to an employee under a wage withholding order. An employer with twenty (20) or more employees shall notify in writing the cabinet or its designee no later than forty-five (45) days before the lump-sum payment is to be made or, if the employee’s right to the lump-sum payment is determined less than forty-five (45) days before it is to be made, the date on which that determination is made. After notification, the employer shall hold each lump-sum payment of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more for thirty (30) days after the date on which it would otherwise be paid to the employee and, on order of the court, pay all or a specified amount of the lump-sum payment to the Department for Income Support, Child Support Enforcement. The employer may deduct the sum of one dollar ($1) for each payment.

As used in this subsection, “lump-sum payment of any kind” means a lump-sum payment of earnings as defined in KRS

427.005

.

Any assignment made pursuant to court order shall have priority as against any attachment, execution, or other assignment, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

No assignment under this section by an employee shall constitute grounds for dismissal of the obligor, refusal to employ, or taking disciplinary action against any obligor subject to withholding required by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 109, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 409, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 144, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 22, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 418, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 584, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 633, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 149, § 1, effective January 1, 2006; 2012, ch. 158, § 72, effective July 12, 2012.

405.467.
Withholding order issued by cabinet — Notice — Hearing — Combining orders and allocating amounts — Duty and liability of employer — Priority — Interstate requests.

All support orders issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, including those issued pursuant to Part D, Title IV of the Federal Social Security Act, shall provide for immediate withholding of earnings of the parent or parents obligated to pay child support and medical support as is necessary to pay the child support obligation, except where one (1) of the parties demonstrates, and the court or administrative order finds that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding, or a written agreement is reached by both parties which provides for an alternative arrangement.

In any case in which a support order was issued in the state and in which a parent is required to pay court-ordered or administratively determined child support, medical support, maintenance, and medical support insurance, and wage withholding is not in effect, and an arrearage accrues that is equal to the amount of support payment for one (1) month, upon request of the absent parent, request of the custodial parent, or upon administrative determination, the secretary shall issue an order for withholding of earnings of the parent as is necessary to comply with the order plus interest at the legal rate on the arrearage, if any, without the need for a judicial or administrative hearing.

If a court-ordered arrearage repayment amount does not exist and an arrearage accrues that is equal to the amount of support payable for one (1) month, an arrearage repayment amount may be determined administratively. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the guidelines for arrearage payments.

In any case in which a parent is required either by court order or administrative order to provide medical insurance coverage for the child and the parent has failed to make application to obtain coverage for the child, the secretary shall issue an order for withholding of the employee’s share, if any, of premiums for health coverage and to pay the share of premiums to the insurer, without the need for a judicial or administrative hearing.

The cabinet shall advise the obligated parent that a wage withholding has commenced by sending a copy of the order to withhold at the same time that the order is sent to the employer. The only basis for contesting the withholding shall be a mistake of fact or law. If the parent contests the withholding, the cabinet shall give the obligor an opportunity to present his or her case at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and decide if the withholding will continue.

The cabinet shall combine any administrative or judicial wage withholding order, or multiple administrative or judicial orders for child support and medical support into a single wage withholding order when payable through the cabinet to a single family or to multiple family units.

The cabinet shall serve the order to withhold earnings or notice of multiple wage withholding orders specifying wage withholding requirements on the employer of an obligor by certified mail, return receipt requested. The order shall state the amount to be withheld, or the requirement to enroll the child under the health insurance coverage, including amounts to be applied to arrearages, plus interest at the legal rate on the arrearage, if any, and the date the withholding is to begin. The total amount to be withheld, including current support and payment on arrearages plus interest, and medical insurance coverage may not exceed the limit permitted under the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act at 15

U.S.C. sec. 1673(b)

.

If there is more than one (1) notice for child support withholding against a single absent parent, the cabinet shall allocate amounts available for withholding, giving priority to current child support, up to the limits imposed under Section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act at 15

U.S.C. sec. 1673(b)

. The allocation by the cabinet shall not result in a withholding for one (1) of the support obligations not being implemented. Amounts resulting from wage withholding shall be allocated on a proportionate basis between multiple family units. Any custodial parent adversely affected by the provisions of this subsection shall have standing to challenge any proportionate allocations and, for good cause shown, a District Court, Circuit Court, or family court of competent jurisdiction may set aside the cabinet’s proportional allocations as to the custodial parent.

If the amounts to be withheld preclude collection of the total amount of combined child support and medical support due to the limits of the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act at 15

U.S.C. sec. 1673(b)

, the actual amount received shall be applied first to the current monthly child support obligation amount. Any payment exceeding the current monthly child support obligation shall then be applied by the cabinet to the administratively ordered or judicially ordered medical support obligation.

The employer shall forward to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that portion of salary or wages of the parent due and to be due in the future as will be sufficient to pay the child support amount ordered.

The employer shall be held liable to the cabinet for any amount which the employer fails to withhold from earnings due an obligor following receipt of an order to withhold earnings.

Any order to withhold earnings under this section shall have priority as against any attachment, execution, or other assignment, notwithstanding any state statute or administrative regulation to the contrary.

No withholding under this section shall be grounds for discharging from employment, refusing to employ, or taking disciplinary action against any obligor subject to withholding required by this section.

The remedies provided for in this section shall also be available for applicable support orders issued in other states.

Interstate requests for withholding of earnings shall be processed by the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 487, § 16, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 23, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 418, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 355, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 365, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 25, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 585, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 634, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 162, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

405.470.
Order to withhold and deliver property.

The secretary may collect delinquent child support by issuing an order to withhold and deliver earnings or property of any kind, real and personal, including booting of vehicle in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

205.745

, which the secretary has reason to believe are due, owing or belonging to the parent.

Fifty percent (50%) of the disposable earnings against which a support debt is asserted shall be exempt and may be delivered to the obligor. The only other exemptions allowed shall be those provided in KRS

427.060

.

The order shall continue to operate until the child support debt is paid in full and shall take priority over all other debts and creditors of such debtor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 411, § 24, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 365, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 430, § 14, effective July 14, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Graham, Domestic Relations, 73 Ky. L.J. 379 (1984-85).

405.480.
Order to withhold — Service — Contents.

An order to withhold and deliver shall be personally served or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, on the person in possession or control of the property and the obligor.

The order shall state the basis for and the amount of the support debt and that the obligor may offer a bond satisfactory to the cabinet to avoid losing possession of the property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 411, § 25, effective July 15, 1988.

405.490.
Answer to order to withhold — Procedure for obligor to contest amount of delinquent support withheld.

Any person, including the obligor, who has been served with an order to withhold and deliver the obligor’s property shall answer the order within twenty (20) days.

The person in possession of any obligor’s property shall withhold it and deliver it to the cabinet in accordance with the secretary’s directions; or the obligor may offer a bond which is satisfactory to the cabinet.

The person in possession of obligor’s property shall have no liability or further responsibility after fulfilling the duties under this section.

The obligor may dispute the amount of delinquent support by requesting a dispute hearing with twenty (20) days.

If the obligor does not request a hearing, acknowledgment of the obligation is presumed and the secretary may apply the withheld property to the delinquent child support obligation.

If a hearing is requested, when property or a bond is released to the secretary pursuant to an order to withhold and deliver property, the secretary shall hold the property or bond, pending determination of the obligor’s liability by a hearing officer, pursuant to KRS

405.450

.

Upon a decision adverse to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services by a hearing officer, of the Circuit Court on appeal, the cabinet shall return the property together with interest at the legal rate for judgments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 15, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 26, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 418, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 586, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 635, effective June 20, 2005.

405.500.
Rebuttable presumption of receipt of notice.

Whenever KRS

205.715

to

205.800

,

403.215

,

405.405

to

405.520

, 405.991(2), and

530.050

require delivery of a notice or other communication in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested, receipt shall be rebuttably presumed if the obligor or any other adult with apparent authority at the obligor’s address signs a receipt or if the obligor or other adult refuses to accept the notice or communication.

In the case of a notice to withhold and deliver property served on a person in possession or control of property, receipt shall be rebuttably presumed if the person to whom the order is directed signs or refuses to sign a receipt or if his employee, agent or other adult with apparent authority signs or refuses to sign a receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 411, § 27, effective July 15, 1988.

405.510.
Reciprocity.

Persons holding earnings or real or personal property in Kentucky of obligors who owe child support shall honor valid orders of other states’ courts to enforce child support obligations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 411, § 28, effective July 15, 1988.

405.520.
Administrative regulations.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of KRS

205.715

to

205.800

,

403.215

,

405.405

to

405.520

, 405.991(2), and

530.050

. The cabinet may adopt regulations necessary to prevent conflict with federal laws and regulations or the loss of federal funds and to establish procedures necessary to guarantee due process of law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 411, § 29, effective July 15, 1988.

405.530.
Penalty. [Renumbered.]